trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
    <pardef n="s/embrar__vblex">
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrare</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrare</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrareis</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embraren</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrares</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrase</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrase</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embraseis</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrasen</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrases</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embráremos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>embrásemos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embra</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__canta" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraba</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraba</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrabais</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraban</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrabas</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrad</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrad</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantad" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrada</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embradas</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrado</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrados</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embramos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embramos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrando</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrar</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrar</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrara</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrara</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrarais</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraran</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraras</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraremos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraron</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrará</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrarán</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrarás</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraré</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraréis</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraría</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraría</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraríais</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraríamos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrarían</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrarías</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embraste</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrasteis</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embremos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embremos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrá</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantá" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrábamos</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrád</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantád" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embráis</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrándo</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>embrár</l>
        <r>embrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantár" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>

      <e lm="sembrar"><i>s</i><par n="s/embrar__vblex"/></e>
